Massachusetts, session 194th, H190.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The cannabis control commission shall commission a study on the structure 
of fines for violations of cannabis advertising regulations and the use of monies collected from 
such fines. The study shall examine: (i) the fine structure for violations of cannabis advertising 
regulations, including how violators of cannabis advertising regulations are currently fined and 
any improvements that may be made to the fine structure to prevent unwanted cannabis 
advertising practices; and (ii) the investment of monies collected from fines for violations of 
cannabis advertising regulations into the communities that have been affected by prohibited 
cannabis advertising practices, including, but not limited to, investments in DARE programs, 
extracurricular programs and police engagement with the communities they serve. 

of 2 10  SECTION 2. The cannabis control commission shall file a report, including any 
recommendations it may make on: (i) the structure of fines for the violation of cannabis 
advertising regulations; and (ii) the investment of monies collected as a result of such fines into 
communities affected by prohibited cannabis advertising practices, with the clerks of the house 
of representatives and the senate and the joint committee on cannabis policy no later than 
January 1, 2027.